Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 83.990 is amended to read:
83.990. (1)  Any person who violates any provision of ORS 83.510 to 83.680 commits a Class A
violation.
(2) A willful violation of  ORS 83.520 to 83.600 or 83.650 to 83.670 by any person [ shall bar ] bars
recovery of any finance charge, delinquency or collection charge or refinancing charge  on the retail
installment contract involved.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of [ subsections (1) to  (3)] subsection (1) or (2)  of this section,
any failure to  comply with any provision of ORS 83.510 to 83.680 may be corrected within 10 days
after the holder is notified [ thereof] of  the failure  in writing by the buyer, and, if so corrected,
neither the seller nor the holder [ shall be ] is  subject to any penalty.
(4) Any person who willfully and intentionally  violates any provision of ORS 83.010 to 83.190
commits a Class B  misdemeanor. Violation of any order or injunction issued pursuant to ORS 83.010
to 83.190 [ shall constitute ] constitutes  prima facie proof of a violation of this subsection.
(5) A person that violates a provision of  ORS 83.710 to 83.750 engages in an unlawful
practice under ORS 646.608.
SECTION 2.  ORS 646.608, as amended by section 6, chapter 410, Oregon Laws  2023, is amended
to read:
646.608. (1) A person  engages in an unlawful practice if in the course of the person’s business,
vocation or occupation the person does any of the following:
(a) Passes off real estate, goods or services as the real estate, goods or services of another.
(b) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to the  source, sponsorship, ap-
proval, or certification of real estate, goods or services.
(c) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to affiliation,  connection, or asso-
ciation with, or certification by, another.
(d) Uses deceptive representations or designations  of geographic origin in connection with real
estate, goods or services.
(e) Represents that real estate, goods or services have  sponsorship, approval, characteristics,
ingredients, uses, benefits, quantities  or qualities that the real estate, goods or services do not have
or that a  person has a sponsorship, approval, status, qualification, affiliation, or connection that the
person does not have.
Enrolled House Bill 3605 (HB 3605-A) Page 1
(f) Represents that  real estate or goods are original or new if the real estate or goods are de-
teriorated, altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used or secondhand.
(g) Represents that real  estate, goods or services are of a particular standard, quality, or grade,
or that real estate or goods are of a  particular style or model, if the real estate, goods or services
are of another.
(h) Disparages the real estate, goods, services, property or business of a  customer or another
by false or misleading representations of fact.
(i) Advertises real estate, goods or services with intent not to provide the real estate, goods or
services as advertised,  or with intent not to supply reasonably expectable public demand, unless the
advertisement discloses a limitation of quantity.
(j) Makes false or misleading representations  of fact concerning the reasons for, existence of,
or amounts of price reductions.
(k) Makes false or misleading representations concerning credit availability or the nature of  the
transaction or obligation incurred.
(L) Makes false or misleading representations  relating to commissions or other compensation to
be paid in exchange for permitting real estate, goods or  services to be used for model or demon-
stration purposes or in exchange for submitting names of potential customers.
(m) Performs service  on or dismantles any goods or real estate if the owner or apparent owner
of the goods or real estate does not authorize the service or dismantling.
(n) Solicits potential customers by telephone  or door to door as a seller unless the person pro-
vides the information required under ORS 646.611.
(o) In a sale, rental or other disposition of real estate, goods  or services, gives or offers to give
a rebate or discount or otherwise pays or offers to pay value to the customer  in consideration of
the customer giving to  the person the names of prospective purchasers, lessees, or borrowers, or
otherwise aiding the person in making a sale, lease, or loan  to another person, if earning the rebate,
discount or other value is contingent upon an event occurring after the time the  customer enters
into the transaction.
(p) Makes any false  or misleading statement about a prize, contest or promotion used to publi-
cize a product, business or service.
(q) Promises to deliver real estate, goods  or services within a certain period of time with intent
not to deliver the real estate, goods or services as promised.
(r) Organizes or induces or attempts to induce membership in a pyramid club.
(s) Makes false or misleading  representations of fact concerning the offering price of, or the
person’s cost for real estate, goods or services.
(t) Concurrent with tender or delivery of any real estate, goods or services, fails to disclose any
known material defect or material nonconformity.
(u) Engages in any other unfair or deceptive conduct in trade or commerce.
(v) Violates any of the provisions  relating to auction sales, consignment sales, auctioneers,
consignees or auction marts under ORS 698.640, whether  in a commercial or noncommercial situ-
ation.
(w) Manufactures mercury fever thermometers.
(x) Sells or supplies mercury fever thermometers unless the  thermometer is required by federal
law, or is:
(A) Prescribed by a person licensed under ORS chapter 677; and
(B) Supplied with instructions on the careful handling  of the thermometer to avoid breakage and
on the proper cleanup of mercury should breakage occur.
(y) Sells a thermostat that  contains mercury, unless the thermostat is labeled in a manner to
inform the purchaser that mercury is present in the thermostat  and that the thermostat may not be
disposed of until the mercury is removed, reused, recycled  or otherwise managed to ensure that the
mercury does not  become part of the solid waste stream or wastewater. For purposes of this para-
graph, “thermostat” means a device commonly used to sense and,  through electrical communication
with heating, cooling or ventilation equipment, control room temperature.
Enrolled House Bill 3605 (HB 3605-A) Page 2
(z) Sells or offers for sale a motor vehicle manufactured after January 1, 2006, that contains
mercury light switches.
(aa) Violates the provisions of ORS 803.375, 803.385 or 815.410 to 815.430.
(bb) Violates ORS 646A.070 (1).
(cc) Violates any requirement of ORS 646A.030 to 646A.040.
(dd) Violates the provisions of ORS 128.801 to 128.898.
(ee) Violates ORS 646.883 or 646.885.
(ff) Violates ORS 646.569 or 646A.374.
(gg) Violates the provisions of ORS 646A.142.
(hh) Violates ORS 646A.360.
(ii) Violates ORS 646.553 or 646.557 or any rule adopted pursuant thereto.
(jj) Violates ORS 646.563.
(kk) Violates ORS 759.680 or any rule adopted pursuant thereto.
(LL) Violates the  provisions of ORS 759.705, 759.710 and 759.720 or any rule adopted pursuant
thereto.
(mm) Violates ORS 646A.210 or 646A.214.
(nn) Violates any provision of ORS 646A.124 to 646A.134.
(oo) Violates ORS 646A.095.
(pp) Violates ORS 822.046.
(qq) Violates ORS 128.001.
(rr) Violates ORS 646A.800 (2) to (4).
(ss) Violates ORS 646A.090 (2) to (5).
(tt) Violates ORS 87.686.
(uu) Violates ORS 646A.803.
(vv) Violates ORS 646A.362.
(ww) Violates ORS 646A.052 or any rule adopted under ORS 646A.052 or 646A.054.
(xx) Violates ORS 180.440 (1) or 180.486 (1).
(yy) Commits the offense of acting as a vehicle dealer without a certificate under ORS 822.005.
(zz) Violates ORS 87.007 (2) or (3).
(aaa) Violates ORS 92.405 (1), (2) or (3).
(bbb) Engages in an unlawful practice under ORS 646.648.
(ccc) Violates ORS 646A.365.
(ddd) Violates ORS 98.853, 98.854, 98.856 or 98.858.
(eee) Sells a gift card in violation of ORS 646A.276.
(fff) Violates ORS 646A.102, 646A.106 or 646A.108.
(ggg) Violates ORS 646A.430 to 646A.450.
(hhh) Violates a provision of ORS 744.318 to 744.384.
(iii) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.702 to 646A.720.
(jjj) Violates ORS 646A.530  30 or more days after a recall notice, warning or declaration de-
scribed in ORS 646A.530 is issued for the children’s product, as defined in ORS 646A.525, that is  the
subject of the violation.
(kkk) Violates a provision of ORS 697.612, 697.642, 697.652, 697.662, 697.682, 697.692 or 697.707.
(LLL) Violates the consumer  protection provisions of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50
U.S.C. 3901 et seq., as in effect on January 1, 2010.
(mmm) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.480 to 646A.495.
(nnn) Violates ORS 646A.082.
(ooo) Violates ORS 646.647.
(ppp) Violates ORS 646A.115.
(qqq) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.405.
(rrr) Violates ORS 646A.092.
(sss) Violates a provision of ORS 646.644.
(ttt) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.295.
Enrolled House Bill 3605 (HB 3605-A) Page 3
(uuu) Engages in the business of, or acts in the  capacity of, an immigration consultant, as de-
fined in ORS 9.280, in this state and for compensation, unless federal law authorizes the person  to
do so or unless the person is an active member of the Oregon State Bar.
(vvv) Violates ORS 702.012, 702.029 or 702.054.
(www) Violates ORS 646A.806.
(xxx) Violates ORS 646A.810 (2).
(yyy) Violates ORS 443.376.
(zzz) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.770 to 646A.787.
(aaaa) Violates ORS 815.077.
(bbbb) Violates a provision of ORS 83.710 to 83.750.
(2) A representation under subsection (1) of this section  or ORS 646.607 may be any manifesta-
tion of any assertion by words or conduct, including, but not limited to, a failure  to disclose a fact.
(3) In order to prevail in an action or suit under ORS 336.184 and 646.605  to 646.652, a prose-
cuting attorney need not prove competition between the parties or actual  confusion or misunder-
standing.
(4) An action or suit may not be brought under subsection (1)(u) of this section  unless the At-
torney  General  has first established a rule in accordance with the provisions of ORS chapter 183
declaring the conduct to be unfair or deceptive in trade or commerce.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 336.184 and 646.605 to 646.652, if an action  or
suit is brought under subsection (1)(xx) of this section by a person other than a prosecuting attor-
ney, relief is limited to an injunction, and  the prevailing party may be awarded reasonable attorney
fees.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 7, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3605 (HB 3605-A) Page 4